Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202052-1907
Submission for filing or recording; liability.

If a person submits for filing or recording to the Secretary of
State, county clerk, register of deeds, or clerk of any court any document
purporting to create a nonconsensual common-law lien against real or personal
property in violation of sections
52-1901 and 52-1905 to 52-1907 or section 76-296 and such document
is so filed or recorded, the claimant submitting the document
is liable to the person or entity against whom the lien is claimed for actual
damages plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 2003, LB 655, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 52-1902;

Laws 2013, LB3, § 6.